Massachusetts, session 194th, H4809.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 24K the following section:-
Section 24L. A consumer who successfully defends themselves against a civil action to
collect an alleged debt brought by a creditor, a debt collector or a third party loan servicer shall
be entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
SECTION 2. The second paragraph of section 49 of said chapter 93 of the General Laws,
as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(e) For a medical debt, the creditor: (i) uses an automatic call or robocall; (ii)
communicates or implies that medical care will be withheld from the alleged debtor until the
medical debt is paid; (iii) fails to advise the alleged debtor of the option to contact an attorney or
contact the attorney general; or (iv) violates any other provision of this section.
of 8

SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section 52 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by striking out clause (6) and inserting in place thereof the
following 2 clauses:-
(6) Any item of information concerning medical debt, as defined by section 1 of chapter
93M.
(7) Any other adverse item of information which antedates the report by more than seven
years.
SECTION 4. Subsection (b) of said section 52 of said chapter 93, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking, in line 18, the words “The provisions of subsection (a)” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- Except as provided in clause (6), the provisions
of subsection (a).
SECTION 5. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 93L the
following chapter:-
CHAPTER 93M.
MEDICAL DEBT PROTECTION ACT.
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Consumer”, a natural person, provided, that “consumer” shall include a parent if the
consumer is a minor, or a legal guardian if the consumer is an adult under guardianship.
“Consumer reporting agency”, as defined in section 50 of chapter 93.
of 8

“Debt buyer”, an individual or entity that is engaged in the business of purchasing
consumer debt for collection purposes, whether it collects the debt itself or hires a third party for
collection or an attorney for litigation in order to collect such debt.
“Disposable earnings”, the remaining portion of a consumer’s wages, salary or
compensation for personal services, including bonuses and commissions, or otherwise, and
includes payments pursuant to a pension or retirement program or deferred compensation plan,
after deducting from such earnings those amounts required by law to be withheld.
“External review”, a review of an adverse benefit determination, including a final internal
adverse benefit determination, and any applicable state external review process, conducted
pursuant to section 16 of chapter 6D and chapter 176O, a federal external review process as
described at 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-19, a review pursuant to 29 U.S.C. 1133, a Medicare appeals
process, a Medicaid appeals process conducted pursuant to chapter 118E and the provisions of
103 CMR 613.00, or another applicable appeals process.
“Extraordinary collection action”, any action that require a legal or judicial process,
including any of the following: (1) placing a lien on a consumer’s property; (2) attaching or
seizing a consumer’s bank account or any other personal property; (3) commencing a civil action
against a consumer; or (4) garnishing a consumer’s wages.
“Health care entity”, as defined in section 1 of 6D.
“Health care professional”, as defined in section 1 of 176O.
“Health care provider”, as defined in section 1 of 176O.
of 8

“Health care services”, as defined in section 1 of 6D. For the purposes of this chapter,
these services shall include, but not be limited to, any care, procedures, products, supplies,
devices or medications.
“Medical creditor”, any person who offers or extends credit creating a medical debt or to
whom a medical debt is owed for health care services.
"Medical debt", any debt incurred or any obligation owed directly to a health care entity,
health care professional, or health care provider for the payment of money arising out of any
agreement or contract, express or implied, for the provision of health care services. Medical debt
includes debt charged to a credit card or other credit instrument, on or after January 1, 2025,
under an open-end or closed-end credit plan offered specifically to pay for health care services.
“Medical debt collector”, any person that regularly collects or attempts to collect, directly
or indirectly, medical debt originally owed or due or asserted to be owed or due another.
Section 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no medical
creditor or medical debt collector shall sell medical debt to a debt buyer.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no medical creditor or
medical debt collector shall report any item of information concerning medical debt to a
consumer reporting agency.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the following
extraordinary collections actions shall not be used by any medical creditor or medical debt
collector to collect debts owed for health care services: (1) causing a consumer’s arrest; (2)
of 8

causing a consumer to be subject to a writ of body attachment or capias; (3) foreclosing on a
consumer’s real property.
Section 3. (a) No medical creditor or medical debt collector shall engage in any
permissible extraordinary collection actions until 180 days after the first bill for a medical debt
has been sent.
(b) At least 30 days before taking any extraordinary collection actions, a medical creditor
or medical debt collector must provide to the patient a notice: (1) identifying the extraordinary
collection actions that will be initiated in order to obtain payment; and (2) providing a date after
which such extraordinary collection actions will be initiated which may be no earlier than 30
days after the date of the notice.
Section 4. (a) No medical creditor or medical debt collector that knows or should have
known about an internal review, external review, or other appeal of a health insurance decision
that is pending now or was pending within the previous 60 days shall: (1) communicate with the
consumer regarding the unpaid charges for health care services for the purpose of seeking to
collect the charges; (2) initiate a lawsuit or arbitration proceeding against the consumer relative
to unpaid charges for health care services; or (3) refer, place or send the medical debt to a
medical debt collector.
Section 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), if a plaintiff prevails in an action to
collect a medical debt, interest computed pursuant to section 6C of chapter 231 or section 8 of
chapter 235 shall be limited to a fixed rate of interest of 12 per cent per annum.
(b) For actions to collect a medical debt, judgments entered on or after January 1, 2026,
or where an application for renewal of judgment is filed on or after January 1, 2026, interest shall
of 8

be limited to a fixed rate of 3 per cent per annum. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to require any interest which accrued at a higher interest rate prior to January 1, 2026, to be
recalculated or reduced to the new 3 per cent rate. Judgments issued prior to January 1, 2026,
with an interest rate other than 3 per cent per annum shall not be required to be amended or
reissued by the courts.
Section 6. (a) Notwithstanding section 34 of chapter 235, the following property of a
100 consumer obligated to pay any medical debt shall be exempt from seizure on execution:
101 (i) estates of homestead as defined in chapter 188;
102 (ii) $5,000 in cash or savings or other deposits in a banking or investment institution;
103 (iii) an automobile not exceeding $15,000 of wholesale resale value; provided, however,
104 that the wholesale resale value of a vehicle owned or substantially used by consumer or a
105 dependent who is either a disabled person or a person 60 years of age or older shall be entirely
106 exempt; and
107 (iv) income from child support payments.
108 (b) The property subject to the exemptions in this section shall be adjusted annually by
109 the Secretary of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts, beginning on January 1, 2026 and
110 thereafter on January 1 of each successive year by the increase in the cost of living as measured
111 by the percentage increase as of August of the immediately preceding year over the level as of
112 August of the previous year of the consumer price index for all urban consumers, or its successor
113 index as published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or its
114 successor agency, with the amount of the exemption rounded up to the nearest $100.
of 8

115 Section 7. (a) Notwithstanding section 34 of chapter 235, if a consumer’s earnings are
116 attached to satisfy a judgment for collection of a medical debt, wages equal to the greater of 90
117 per cent of the debtor's disposable earnings or 65 times the greater of the federal minimum
118 hourly wage under U.S.C. section 206(a)(1) or the state minimum hourly wage under section 1 of
119 chapter 151 in effect at the time shall be exempt from the attachment and not subject to
120 garnishment. This exemption shall be adjusted pro rata for a pay period that is more than weekly.
121 (b) An employer shall not take adverse action against an employee or refuse to hire a
122 consumer because of one or more garnishments for medical debts or because of obligations that
123 any garnishments impose against the employer. An employer who violates this section shall be
124 liable in a civil action, action for contempt or other appropriate proceeding to the employee or
125 consumer for the wages and employment benefits lost by the employee or consumer from the
126 time of the unlawful discipline, suspension, refusal to hire or discharge to the period of
127 reinstatement and an additional penalty of not more than $1,000.
128 Section 8. Failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, or any regulation
129 promulgated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, shall constitute an unfair or
130 deceptive act or practice under the provisions of paragraph (a) of section 2 of chapter 93A.
131 SECTION 6. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
132 section 2J the following section:-
133 Section 2K. (a) No hospital, acute care hospital, clinic or other health care facility
134 licensed pursuant to this chapter shall deny a person medically necessary health care solely by
135 reason of the person’s unpaid medical debt.
of 8

136 (b) A hospital, acute care hospital, clinic or other health care facility licensed pursuant to
137 this chapter shall make publicly available on its website its medical debt collection policies.
138 SECTION 7. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
139 section 1B the following section:-
140 Section 1C. (a) No health care provider licensed, registered or certified pursuant to this
141 chapter shall deny a person medically necessary health care solely by reason of the person’s
142 unpaid medical debt.
143 (b) A health care provider licensed, registered or certified pursuant to this chapter shall
144 make available to patients their policy on medical debt collection.
145 SECTION 8. Chapter 93M of the General Laws shall apply to consumer medical debts
146 incurred and contracts that take effect or are renewed on or after January 1, 2027.
147 SECTION 9. This act shall take effect on October 1, 2026.
of 8